Massachusetts, session 194th, H2999.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end of paragraph 2 the following:- "Should a governmental
agency enter into a trust or joint purchase agreement, a board and steering committee shall be
established, including members of the appropriate public authorities, a minimum of one quarter
(25%) of the members shall come from labor representatives elected from a list of
representatives nominated by the collective bargaining units and a retiree from one of the
governmental units appointed by the Retired State, County, and Municipal Association of
Massachusetts. All members will be considered voting members.
of 1